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LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1252 / 52 Hydraulic Brake Booster Pump Motor
ON Time Abnormally Long

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1252 /52
After the ignitionswitchhasbeen turnedON,when the
power issupplied to thepumpmotor formore than5min-
utes.

SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotor
SHydraulicbrakeboosterpumpmotorcircuit

SPressureswitch (PHorPL)

WIRING DIAGRAM

DI6XQ−03
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check operation of hydraulic brake booster pump motor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from the hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Connect battery positive  lead to BM1 or BM2 terminal and
battery negative  lead to EM1 or EM2 terminal of the hydraulic
brake booster (pump motor) connector.
OK:

The operation sound of the pump motor should be
heard.

NG Go to step 9.

OK

2 Check for short circuit (to B+) in harness and connector between BM1 or BM2 of
hydraulic brake booster and ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2 relay
(See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Check for short circuit (to B+) in harness and connector between MTT of hydrau-
lic brake booster and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
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4 Check pressure switch (PH).

In case of using the hand−held tester.
PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) Select the DATALIST mode on the hand−held tester.
CHECK:
Depress the brake pedal more than 40 times with the ignition switch OFF then turn the ignition switch ON
and check the pressure switch (PH) condition.
HINT:
When a pressure in power supply system is released, reaction force becomes light and stroke becomes long-
er.
OK:

”OFF” turns to ”ON”.
HINT:
OFF: Low pressure
ON: High pressure
In case of not using the hand−held tester.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the connector (5P) from the hydraulic brake

booster.
(b) With the ignition switch OFF, depress the brake pedal more than

40 times to decrease the accumulator pressure.
HINT:
When a pressure in power supply system is released, reaction
force becomes light and stroke becomes longer.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals PH and PHG of hydrau-
lic brake booster connector.
OK:

Resistance: 1.0 k�
PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector (5P) to the hydraulic brake boost-

er.
(b) Disconnect the connector (5P) after ignition switch has

been ON and the pump motor has stopped.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals PH and PHG of hydrau-
lic brake booster connector.
OK:

Resistance:0 �

HINT:
After inspection, connect the connector and clear the DTC (See
page DI−185).

NG Replace hydraulic brake booster assembly.
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OK

5 Check pressure switch (PL).

Incaseofusinghand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Depress the brake pedal more than 40 times with the ignition switch OFF then turn the ignition switch ON
and check the pressure switch (PL) condition.
HINT:
When a pressure in power supply system is released, reaction force becomes light and stroke becomes long-
er.
OK:

”OFF” turns to ”ON”.
HINT:
OFF: Low pressure
ON: High pressure
Incaseofnotusinghand −held tester:

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the connector (8P) from the hydraulic brake

booster.
(b) With the ignition switch OFF, depress the brake pedal

more than 40 times to decrease the accumulator pres-
sure.

HINT:
When a pressure in power supply system is released, reaction
forcebecomes lightandstrokebecomes longer.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals PL and PLG of hydrau-
lic brake booster connector.
OK:

Resistance:5.7k �

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the connector (8P) to the hydraulic brake boost-

er.
(b) Disconnect the connector (8P) after ignition switch has

been ON and the pump motor has stopped.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals PL and PLG of hydrau-
lic brake booster connector.
OK:

Resistance: 1.0k �
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HINT:
After inspection, connect the connector and clear the DTC (See
page DI−185).

NG Replace hydraulic brake booster assembly.

OK

6 Check for short circuit (to B+) in harness and connector between pressure
switch and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

7 Check ABS motor 1 and ABS motor 2 relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS motor 1 and ABS motor 2 relay from engine room
J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each pair of terminal of motor relay.
OK:

Terminals 3 and 4
Continuity

(Reference value �
�)

Terminals 1 and 2 Open

*1: ABS motor 1 relay 54 �

ABS motor 2 relay 62 �

CHECK:
(a) Apply battery voltage between terminals 3 and 4.
(b) Check continuity between terminals.
OK:

Terminals 1 and 2 Continuity



DI−276 −DIAGNOSTICS ABS & VEHICLE STABILITY CONTROL (VSC) &
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

NG Replace ABS motor 1 or ABS motor 2 relay.

OK

8 Check for short circuit in harness and connector between ABS motor 1 or ABS
motor 2 relay and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace skid control ECU.

9 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between hydraulic
brake booster and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Replace wire harness.

OK

10 Check hydraulic brake booster pump motor (See Pub. No. RM731E on page
BR−8).

NG Replace hydraulic brake booster pump motor.

OK

Replace hydraulic brake booster.


